zh-CN: 十字绣成品类型: 书签; 杯垫; 镶框画; 花环/旗彩; 贺卡; 绣花箍成品; 磁铁; 装饰品; 补丁/贴花; 枕头/靠垫; 拼布块; 立式/3D 图形; 托特包/包; 毛巾/亚麻织物; 其他
tr: Kanaviçe bitirme türü: Yer işareti; Bardak altlığı; Çerçeveli resim; Çelenk/flama; Tebrik kartı; Kasnaklı bitiş; Mıknatıs; Süs; Yama/aplike; Yastık/kırlent; Yorgan bloğu; Dik duran/3D figür; Bez çanta/çanta; Havlu/keten; Diğer
el: Τύπος φινιρίσματος σταυροβελονιάς: Σελιδοδείκτης; Σουβέρ; Κορνιζαρισμένη εικόνα; Γιρλάντα/Σημαιάκια; Ευχετήρια κάρτα; Φινίρισμα σε τελάρο; Μαγνήτης; Στολίδι; Μπάλωμα/Απλικέ; Μαξιλάρι/Μαξιλαράκι; Κομμάτι παπλώματος; Ορθοστατική/Τρισδιάστατη φιγούρα; Τσάντα tote/Τσάντα; Πετσέτα/Λευκά είδη; Άλλο
ja: クロスステッチ仕上げタイプ: ブックマーク; コースター; 額装; ガーランド / バンティング; グリーティングカード; フープ仕上げ; マグネット; オーナメント; パッチ / アップリケ; 枕 / クッション; キルトブロック; スタンドアップ / 3D フィギュア; トート / バッグ; タオル / リネン; その他
sk-SK: Typ krížikového prešívania: Záložka; Podtácka; Zarámovaný obrázok; Girlanda/záves; Pohľadnica; Ukončenie v kruhu; Magnet; Ozdoba; Nášivka/aplikácia; Vankúš/poduška; Quiltový blok; Stojaca/3D figúrka; Plátenná taška/kabelka; Uterák/bielizeň; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta zaključka s križnim vbodom: Knjižni kazalec; Podstavek; Uokvirjena slika; Venci/zastavice; Voščilnica; Dokončano v obroču; Magnet; Okrasek; Našitek/aplikacija; Blazina; Blok za prešite odeje; Stoječa/3D-figura; Torbica/torba; Brisača/posteljnina; Drugo
fr: Type de finition de point de croix: Marque-page; Sous-verre; Image encadrée; Guirlande/bannière; Carte de vœux; Finition en cercle; Aimant; Ornement; Écusson/applique; Oreiller/coussin; Bloc de patchwork; Figure sur pied/3D; Fourre-tout/sac; Serviette/linge; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de acabamento em ponto cruz: Marcador de livros; Base para copos; Quadro emoldurado; Grinalda/bandeirolas; Cartão de felicitações; Acabamento em bastidor; Íman; Ornamento; Emblema/aplique; Almofada; Bloco de patchwork; Figura em pé/3D; Saco/mala; Toalha/têxtil para o lar; Outro
lt-LT: Kryžminio siuvinėjimo užbaigimo tipas: Žymelė; Padėkliukas; Įrėmintas paveikslas; Girlianda; Atvirukas; Lankelis; Magnetukas; Ornamentas; Lopas / aplikacija; Pagalvė / pagalvėlė; Skiautinys; Pastatoma / 3D figūra; Krepšys; Rankšluostis / patalynė; Kita
fi: Ristipistotyön viimeistelytyyppi: Kirjanmerkki; Lasinalunen; Kehystetty taulu; Köynnös/viiri; Onnittelukortti; Kirjontakehys; Magneetti; Koriste; Paikka/applikaatio; Tyyny; Tilkkublokki; Pystyssä pysyvä / 3D-hahmo; Kassi/laukku; Pyyhe/liinavaate; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de acabamento de ponto cruz: Marcador de página; Porta-copos; Quadro; Guirlanda/bandeirola; Cartão de felicitações; Acabamento em bastidor; Ímã; Enfeite; Patch/aplique; Travesseiro/almofada; Bloco de patchwork; Figura 3D/em pé; Bolsa/sacola; Toalha/roupa de cama; Outro
pl: Typ wykończenia haftu krzyżykowego: Zakładka; Podkładka; Oprawiony obraz; Girlanda / proporczyki; Kartka okolicznościowa; Wykończenie w tamborku; Magnes; Ozdoba; Naszywka / aplikacja; Poduszka; Blok patchworkowy; Figurka stojąca / 3D; Torba/tote; Ręcznik / pościel; Inne
ru: Тип оформления вышивки крестиком: Закладка; Подставка под чашку; Картина в раме; Гирлянда/флажки; Открытка; Оформление в пяльцах; Магнит; Украшение; Нашивка/аппликация; Подушка; Лоскутный блок; Объемная/3D-фигура; Сумка-шоппер/сумка; Полотенце/белье; Другое
sv: Typ av korsstygnsfinish: Bokmärke; Glasunderlägg; Inramad tavla; Girlang/vimpel; Gratulationskort; Monterad i broderibåge; Magnet; Prydnad; Lapp/applikation; Kudde; Lapptäcksblock; Stående/3D-figur; Tygkasse/väska; Handduk/linne; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип завършване за кръстат бод: Книгоразделител; Подложка за чаша; Картина в рамка; Гирлянд; Поздравителна картичка; Завършек в гергеф; Магнит; Орнамент; Нашивка/апликация; Възглавница; Пачуърк блок; Стояща/3D фигура; Пазарска чанта/чанта; Кърпа/домашен текстил; Други
nb: Type korsstingsbehandling: Bokmerke; Glassbrikke; Innrammet bilde; Girlander / vimpelrekke; Gratulasjonskort; Broderiramme-finish; Magnet; Ornament; Lapp/applikasjon; Pute/pyntepute; Quilt-blokk; Stående / 3D-figur; Handlenett/veske; Håndkle/lin; Annet
de: Fertigstellungsart für Kreuzsticharbeiten: Lesezeichen; Untersetzer; Gerahmtes Bild; Girlande/Wimpelkette; Grußkarte; Stickrahmen-Finish; Magnet; Ornament; Aufnäher/Applikation; Kissen; Quilt-Block; Aufsteller/3D-Figur; Tragetasche/Tasche; Handtuch/Wäsche; Sonstige
da: Type af broderiefterbehandling: Bogmærke; Glasbakke; Indrammet billede; Guirlande/vimpel; Lykønskningskort; Broderiramme-finish; Magnet; Ornament; Lap/applikation; Pude; Quiltblok; Stående/3D-figur; Mulepose/taske; Håndklæde/linned; Andet
vi: Loại hoàn thiện thêu chữ thập: Dấu trang; Đế lót ly; Tranh đóng khung; Vòng hoa/dây cờ; Thiệp chúc mừng; Khung thêu tròn; Nam châm; Đồ trang trí; Miếng đắp/đính kèm; Gối/đệm; Khối chần bông; Hình dáng 3D/đứng; Túi vải/túi xách; Khăn tắm/khăn trải; Khác
nl: Kruissteek afwerkingstype: Bladwijzer; Onderzetter; Ingelijste afbeelding; Slinger/vlaggenlijn; Wenskaart; Ringafwerking; Magneet; Ornament; Patch/applicatie; Kussen; Quiltblok; Staand/3D-figuur; Draagtas/tas; Handdoek/linnengoed; Overig
zh-TW: 十字繡成品形式: 書籤; 杯墊; 裱框圖片; 花環/彩旗; 賀卡; 繡花圈完成品; 磁鐵; 裝飾品; 補丁/貼花; 枕頭/靠墊; 拼布塊; 站立/3D 人物; 托特包/手提袋; 毛巾/亞麻布; 其他
th: ประเภทการตกแต่งแบบปักครอสติช: บุ๊กมาร์ก; ที่รองแก้ว; ภาพใส่กรอบ; พวงมาลัย/ธงราว; การ์ดอวยพร; แบบสะดึง; แม่เหล็ก; เครื่องประดับ; อาร์ม/ป้ายรีดติดเสื้อผ้า; หมอน/เบาะ; บล็อกผ้าห่มควิลท์; หุ่น 3 มิติ/ตั้งโชว์; ถุงผ้า/กระเป๋า; ผ้าเช็ดตัว/ผ้าลินิน; อื่นๆ
hu: Keresztöltés befejezésének típusa: Könyvjelző; Poháralátét; Bekeretezett kép; Füzér/zászlófüzér; Üdvözlőlap; Hímzőkeretes kivitel; Mágnes; Dísz; Foltrátét/applikáció; Párna/díszpárna; Foltvarrásos blokk; Álló/3D figura; Szatyor/táska; Törölköző/vászon; Egyéb
en: Cross stitch finishing type: Bookmark; Coaster; Framed picture; Garland/bunting; Greeting card; Hoop finish; Magnet; Ornament; Patch/applique; Pillow/cushion; Quilt block; Stand-up/3D figure; Tote/bag; Towel/linen; Other
es: Tipo de acabado de punto de cruz: Marcapáginas; Posavasos; Cuadro enmarcado; Guirnalda/banderín; Tarjeta de felicitación; Acabado en bastidor; Imán; Adorno; Parche/aplique; Almohada/cojín; Bloque de colcha; Figura 3D/de pie; Bolso/bolsa; Toalla/ropa blanca; Otro
ro-RO: Tip de finisare cusătură în cruce: Semn de carte; Suport pentru pahar; Tablou înrămat; Ghirlandă/stegulețe; Felicitare; Finisaj pe gherghef; Magnet; Ornament; Petic/aplicație; Pernă/pernuță; Bloc de patchwork; Figurină 3D/de sine stătătoare; Sacoșă/geantă; Prosop/lenjerie; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta završne obrade križnim bodom: Straničnik; Podmetač za čaše; Uokvirena slika; Girlanda/zastavice; Čestitka; Završna obrada u obruču; Magnet; Ukras; Zakrpa/aplikacija; Jastuk/jastučić; Blok za poplun; Samostojeća / 3D figura; Platnena / obična torba; Ručnik/posteljina; Ostalo
ko: 십자수 마감 유형: 북마크; 코스터; 액자 사진; 가랜드/번팅; 인사말 카드; 후프 마감; 자석; 장식; 패치/아플리케; 베개/쿠션; 퀼트 블록; 스탠드형/3D 피규어; 토트/가방; 타월/리넨; 기타
it: tipo di finitura a punto croce: Segnalibro; Sottobicchiere; Quadro incorniciato; Ghirlanda/festone; Biglietto d’auguri; Finitura a telaio; Magnete; Decorazione; Toppa/applicazione; Cuscino; Blocco patchwork; Figura 3D/da appoggio; Borsa/tote; Asciugamano/biancheria; Altro
cs: Typ dokončení křížkového stehu: Záložka; Podtácek; Zarámovaný obrázek; Girlanda/praporky; Přání; Zarámováno v kruhu; Magnet; Ozdoba; Nášivka/aplikace; Polštář/podsedák; Quiltovací blok; Stojící/3D figurka; Taška/kabelka; Ručník/povlečení; Ostatní